Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 1. General Provisions

§ 21-2-101.
Application of Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

The Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

] shall apply to this code [§§

21-1-101

through

21-13-721

] and no hearing shall be held or adjudications made except in compliance with its provisions.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-4.

§ 21-2-102.
Effect on functions and powers of board of trustees of University of Wyoming.

Nothing in this code shall be construed to limit or contravene the functions and powers of the board of trustees of the University of Wyoming as established by law in conformity with the constitution and laws of the state of Wyoming and the laws of the United States.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-5; Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to board of trustees of University of Wyoming generally, see §§

21-17-201

through

21-17-206

.

The 2006 amendment

deleted “Except as provided in W.S.

21-4-304

.”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2006.

Pursuant to the conflicting laws provision in ch. 114, both have been given effect in the section as set out above.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 21-2-103.
Effect on functions and powers of community college commission.

Nothing in this code shall be construed to limit or contravene the functions and powers of the community college commission of Wyoming as established by law.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-6; 2011, ch. 129, § 206; ch. 176, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to powers of community college commission, see §

21-18-202

.

The 2011 amendments. —

The first 2011 amendment, by ch. 129 § 206, effective July 1, 2011, deleted “Except as provided in W.S.

21-4-304

” at the beginning.

The second 2011 amendment, by ch. 176 § 1, deleted “Except as provided in W.S.

21-4-304

” at the beginning.

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

Editor's notes. —

Section

21-4-304

, referred to in this section, was repealed in 1991.

§ 21-2-104.
State department of education established; personnel; facilities.

There shall be a separate and distinct state department designated as the state department of education which shall be under the supervision of the state superintendent and consist of the state superintendent and such divisions, staffed by personnel and provided with facilities the state superintendent determines necessary to assist him in the proper and efficient discharge of his respective duties.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-7; Laws 1987, ch. 190, § 2; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director” for “state superintendent” three times in the first sentence, added “as approved by the governor” at the end of the first sentence, and added the last sentence.

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the first sentence, substituted “state superintendent” for “director” three times, and deleted “as approved by the governor” at the end; and deleted the former last two sentences, which read: “The director shall serve as the chief administrative officer of the department. All duties of the state department of education shall be under the control of the director.”

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

Laws 2015, ch. 30

, amending provisions of this article, states in relevant part: “in accordance with
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300 (Wyo. 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014)”.

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Quoted

in

Natrona County Sch. Dist. v. Ryan, 764 P.2d 1019,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1988).

§ 21-2-105.
Delegation of duties of state superintendent.

The state superintendent may delegate ministerial and nondiscretionary duties within the department of education.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 111, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 21.1-8; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015.

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director” for “state superintendent”, and inserted “state” after “within the”.

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “state superintendent” for “director,” and deleted “state” preceding “department.”

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

Laws 2015, ch. 30

, amending provisions of this article, states in relevant part: “in accordance with
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300 (Wyo. 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014)”.

2013 amendment unconstitutional. —

Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, Chapter 1), which amended this section, is unconstitutional, as it deprives the State Superintendent of Public Instruction the power of ?general supervision of the public schools? that is entrusted to the Superintendent in
Wyo. Const. art. 7, ? 14.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014), and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Cited

in

Natrona County Sch. Dist. v. Ryan, 764 P.2d 1019,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1988).